Washington statutes.
RCW 19.31.250

Chapter provisions exclusive—Authority of political subdivisions not affected.

(1) The provisions of this chapter relating to the regulation of private employment agencies shall be exclusive.

(2) This chapter shall not be construed to affect or reduce the authority of any political subdivision of the state of Washington to provide for the licensing of private employment agencies solely for revenue purposes.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 228 s 25.]